Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-627.01
Skimmer device; installation; unlawful, when; violation; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful to install a skimmer device, without authorization, on an automated banking device or a point-of-sale terminal, including any fuel pump, for the purpose of obtaining money, credit, property, or anything of value, and with the intent to defraud.

(2) Installation of a skimmer device shall be considered done without authorization if such installation is, for any reason, done without authorization by the issuer, account holder, owner of the automated banking device, or owner of the point-of-sale terminal.

(3) A violation of this section is a Class IV felony.

Laws 2025, LB559, § 3.